Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE G. NON-BACCALAUREATE SYSTEM

CHAPTER 131. SOUTHWEST COLLEGE FOR THE DEAF

Sec. 131.001. SOUTHWEST COLLEGE FOR THE DEAF. The Southwest College for the Deaf is a postsecondary educational institution providing instruction for hearing-impaired students preparing for a career or for enrollment in a senior college or university.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 366, ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 2 (H.B. 1101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 131.002. ADMINISTRATION. (a) The college is under the direct control and management of the board of trustees of the Howard Junior College District.

(b) The college and its programs shall be administered by personnel who are trained and qualified to work with hearing-impaired students and are fluent in manual communication skills.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 366, ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 2 (H.B. 1101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 131.003. LOCATION. The college is located on land deeded to the governing board by the federal Department of Education for the purpose of operating the college. The governing board may not conduct regular junior college programs for students with unimpaired hearing on the college campus except as an integral part of the program offered to hearing-impaired students when:

(1) it is educationally appropriate to enroll hearing students in classes for the hearing-impaired; or

(2) special programs are needed to train hearing and hearing-impaired persons to become professional service providers for the deaf.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 366, ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 2 (H.B. 1101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 131.004. COURSES, PROGRAMS, AND SERVICES. (a) The college shall offer, but is not limited to offering, the following courses, programs, and services for hearing-impaired post-secondary students:

(1) learning development services, including academic counseling, tutorial services, reading instruction, services to counter learning disabilities, and library-related services;

(2) communications services, including interpreters for academic and nonacademic functions, speech therapy, and auditory evaluation and training;

(3) academic college preparatory courses;

(4) career analysis services designed to assist each student in identifying a career interest, considering the student's aptitudes, abilities, and skills;

(5) regular college courses, including vocational and technical education and liberal arts courses;

(6) extracurricular activities, including intramural athletics; and

(7) postgraduation services, including job placement services and services designed to orient employers to hearing-impaired workers.

(b) The course work offered by the college shall emphasize self-contained classrooms with instruction conducted by instructors who are trained and qualified to work with hearing-impaired students and are fluent in manual communication skills. Hearing-impaired students may enroll in integrated classes that are regular classes offered to students with unimpaired hearing enrolled in the junior college.

(c) The programs, services, and facilities of the college shall be designed to be appropriate to the needs of hearing-impaired students.

(d) The executive director shall determine which courses offered by the college are appropriate for an electronic display on a screen or terminal, with less than 30 seconds delay, of a speaker's spoken message. The college shall implement the electronic display in those courses.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 366, ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 345, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 2 (H.B. 1101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 131.005. TUITION. (a) A Texas resident student enrolled in the college is exempt from tuition fees under Section 54.364.

(b) A student who is not a resident of Texas shall pay tuition at a rate that is the lesser of:

(1) the rate provided by this code for a nonresident student enrolled at a general academic teaching institution; or

(2) a rate determined by the board of trustees and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board to be the approximate cost to the college, not including room and board, of educating a student during the academic year beginning the next fall.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 366, ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 140, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 116, Sec. 2, eff. May 17, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (S.B. 32), Sec. 10, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 2 (H.B. 1101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 131.006. APPROPRIATIONS; GRANTS. (a) The governing board of the college may receive appropriations for the college's operations only if the board operates the college in compliance with this chapter.

(b) The board may accept gifts, grants, or donations of money or property given to the college for the college's exclusive use in carrying out the purposes of this subchapter.

(c) The board may expend appropriated funds for maintenance and operation, including the maintenance and operation of student housing and food service, unless the funds are specifically restricted to another purpose by the appropriation.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 366, ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 1981. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. April 14, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 2 (H.B. 1101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.